Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-310
Individual sickness and accident or
medicare supplement policy; death of insured; refund of unearned premium.

In the event of the death
of the insured of an individual sickness and accident or medicare supplement
policy, the insurer, upon receipt of a request for a pro rata refund by a
party legally entitled to claim such a refund, shall refund the unearned premium
prorated to the month of the insured's death if the request has been made
within one year after the insured's death. The refund of the premium and termination
of the coverage shall be without prejudice to any claim originating prior
to the date of the insured's death.

Laws 2014, LB735, § 1.